Vermont, session 2025-2026, H424.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 3763b is added to read:
§ 3763b. DONATION OF MANAGED OR RESERVE FORESTLAND TO
THE STATE
VT LEG #380883 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.424
2025 Page 2 of 5
(a) A person who owns managed forestland or reserve forestland in fee
simple may donate the forestland to the Department of Forests, Parks and
Recreation without incurring the land use change tax under section 3757 of this
title.
(b) Notwithstanding the requirement in 10 V.S.A. § 2606 that the Governor
approve of the acceptance of a gift or donation of land to the State, the
Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation shall accept a gift or donation
of land if:
(1) the gift or donation is absolute and is not subject to conditions or
reservations on use of the land;
(2) the owner of the forestland is in good standing under this chapter;
and
(3) the land:
(A) is directly adjacent to State lands owned and managed by the
Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation; and
(B) the land is located within a high priority forest block.
(c) All lands accepted by the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation
under this section shall be managed either as State forestland or as part of a
State Park.
(d) When the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation accepts a gift or
donation of land under this section, the Department shall provide the person
VT LEG #380883 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.424
2025 Page 3 of 5
gifting or donating the land with an assessment of the value of the property for
the purpose of the person providing the gift or donation seeking a federal
charitable income tax deduction.
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A. § 3752(5) is amended to read:
(5)(A) “Development” means, for the purposes of determining whether
a land use change tax is to be assessed under section 3757 of this chapter, the
construction of any building, road, or other structure, or any mining,
excavation, or landfill activity.
(B) “Development” also means the subdivision of a parcel of land
into two or more parcels, regardless of whether a change in use actually occurs,
where one or more of the resulting parcels contains less than 25 acres each; but
if subdivision is solely the result of a transfer to one or more of a spouse, ex-
spouse in a divorce settlement, parent, grandparent, child, grandchild, niece,
nephew, or sibling of the transferor, or to the surviving spouse of any of the
foregoing, then “development” shall not apply to any portion of the newly
created parcel or parcels that qualify for enrollment and for which, within 30
days following the transfer, each transferee or transferor applies for
reenrollment in the Use Value Appraisal Program.
(C) “Development” also means the cutting of timber on property
appraised under this chapter at use value in a manner contrary to a forest or
conservation management plan as provided for in subsection 3755(b) of this
VT LEG #380883 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.424
2025 Page 4 of 5
title during the remaining term of the plan, or contrary to the minimum
acceptable standards for forest management if the plan has expired; or a
change in the parcel or use of the parcel in violation of the conservation
management standards established by the Commissioner of Forests, Parks and
Recreation.
(D) “Development” also means notification of the Director by the
Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets under section 3756 of this title that
the owner or operator of agricultural land or a farm building is violating the
water quality requirements of 6 V.S.A. chapter 215 or is failing to comply with
the terms of an order issued under 6 V.S.A. chapter 215, subchapter 10.
(E) The term “development” does not include the construction,
reconstruction, structural alteration, relocation, or enlargement of any building,
road, or other structure for farming, logging, forestry, or conservation
purposes, but shall include the subsequent commencement of a use of that
building, road, or structure for other than farming, logging, or forestry
purposes.
(F) The term “development” shall not include the location of any
solar generation facility that is, in the aggregate, on 0.1 of an acre of land or
less, provided that the underlying land qualifies under this chapter as
agricultural land or open land that qualifies as managed forestland in
VT LEG #380883 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.424
2025 Page 5 of 5
accordance with standards established by the Commissioner of Forests, Parks
and Recreation.
(G) The term “development” does not include the gift or donation of
land to the State under section 3763b of this title.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380883 v.1